Utah statutes.
17-22-10.   Prisoners under civil process.
Whenever a person is committed upon process in a civil action or proceeding,
except when the state is a party thereto, the sheriff is not bound to receive
such person unless security is given on the part of the party at whose
instance the process is issued, by deposit of money, to meet the expenses of
necessary food, clothing and bedding for him, or to detain such person any
longer than the expenses are provided for. This section does not apply to
cases where a party is committed as a punishment for disobedience to the
mandates, process, writs or orders of court.
